Arkansas statutes. Title 21 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 8

Ethics and Conflicts of Interest

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

21-8-101. Nepotism.

A person who is related within the second degree, by consanguinity or affinity, to a member or employee of a state board or commission shall not be eligible for appointment as a member of the board.

A person who is related within the second degree, by consanguinity or affinity, to a member of a state board or commission shall not be eligible for employment by the board or commission.

This section shall apply only to persons hired or appointed after July 28, 1995.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1123, § 3.

21-8-102. Restrictions on employment of former state officials and former state employees — Definitions.

As used in this section:

“State employee” means an individual employed in the office of:

A judicial, administrative, or other proceeding, application, request for a ruling, or other determination;

A contract;

A former state official or former state employee shall not knowingly act as a principal or agent for anyone other than the state within one (1) year after cessation of his or her employment with the state agency in connection with any of the following if the matters were within the former state official's or former state employee's official responsibility and the state is a party or has a direct or substantial interest:

A judicial, administrative, or other proceeding, application, request for a ruling, or other determination;

A contract;

A claim; or

A charge or controversy.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 1200, § 1; 2013, No. 486, § 2.

21-8-103. Elected state officials prohibited from registering as lobbyists — Definition.

A person serving as an elected state official in any jurisdiction is prohibited from registering as a lobbyist in Arkansas under §21-8-601 et seq. or similarly in any other jurisdiction while the person is serving as an elected state official.

As used in this section, “elected state official” means a person holding an elective office of state government as a constitutional officer or as a member of the General Assembly and includes persons during the time period between the date that he or she is elected and the date he or she takes office.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 342, § 1.

Subchapter 2

— Income Disclosure by Salaried Employees

21-8-201. Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter:

“Public agency” shall include:

The agency with which a state employee is employed, a state board, commission, institution, office, or agency;

Any city, county, or school district, or any agency, division, or instrumentality thereof, including those agencies, divisions, or instrumentalities which are funded in part with funds provided by state appropriations; or

Any area or regional program in this state which derives financial support in whole or in part from state funds or from any nonprofit corporation, foundation, or organization; and

“Regular salary basis” means employment in a full-time position for which a maximum regular salary is established by law.

“Regular salary basis” shall also include:

In the case of the institutions of higher education, any person employed on a contract basis for nine (9) months or more of services where the maximum regular salary is established by law; and

Regular salaries paid from funds deposited in the State Treasury or from bank funds belonging to the state agency, or from federal funds, trust funds, grant funds, donated funds, or other funds of whatever nature administered by the state agency.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 849, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-1629.

21-8-202. Penalty.

Any employee of the State of Arkansas, including employees of the state-supported institutions of higher education, who fails to file or who shall falsely file any statement as required under the provisions of this subchapter shall be guilty of a violation.

Upon conviction, he or she shall be fined in an amount not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500).

Amendments. The 2005 amendment substituted “violation” for “misdemeanor” in (a).

History.

Acts 1977, No. 849, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-1632; Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 141.

21-8-203. Disclosure of income required.

The General Assembly determines that it is essential to the efficient operation of government, and to minimize the opportunities for conflicts of interest, that all state employees who are employed on a regular salary basis shall be required to disclose each source of income in excess of five hundred dollars ($500) earned during any calendar year from sources other than their regular salary from employment or from professional or consultant services rendered for any public agency.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 849, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-1628.

21-8-204. Filing of income disclosure statement.

On or before January 31 following the close of each calendar year, all state employees who are employed by a state office, agency, department, board, commission, or institution of higher education in this state on a regular salary basis shall file a statement under oath reflecting all income in excess of five hundred dollars ($500) received by them during the preceding calendar year as wages or salary or as fees or payments for professional or consultant services rendered to any public agency of this state, other than the salary said person receives on a regular salary basis.

All state employees who are employed by any state office, agency, department, board, or commission, other than employees of institutions of higher education, shall file the statement required herein with the Secretary of State.

All employees of institutions of higher education in the state shall file the statement with the president of the institution of higher education by which the employee is employed.

All such statements filed with the presidents of the various institutions of higher education shall be public records and shall be open to public inspection during reasonable business hours.

A judge violated Canon 4 of the Code of Judicial Conduct, §21-8-203 and this section by failing to properly report his outside income and financial interests to the clerk of the Arkansas Supreme Court and the Secretary of State. Judicial Discipline & Disability Comm'n v. Thompson, 341 Ark. 253, 16 S.W.3d 212 (2000).

Effective Dates. Acts 2001, No. 1839, § 35: became law without governor's signature Apr. 20, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that various provisions of the Arkansas Code relating to campaign financing and ethics are vague or otherwise in need of modification; that this act accomplishes those purposes; and that this act should go into effect as soon as possible so that those persons who are subject to the provisions of the various ethics and campaign finance statutes receive the benefit of the clarifications as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2015, No. 1280, § 16: Apr. 8, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the people of Arkansas adopted Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 94, at the 2014 General Election, which added Sections 28, 29, and 30 to Article 19 of the Arkansas Constitution; that Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 94, requires the General Assembly to provide by law that Arkansas Constitution, Article 19, Sections 28, 29, and 30 be under the jurisdiction of the Arkansas Ethics Commission; that this act should become effective at the earliest opportunity to allow the commission to enforce Arkansas Constitution, Article 19, Sections 28, 29, and 30 and issue guidance to affected public officials; and that the additional provisions of this act provide clarity to the ethics laws of the State of Arkansas and should become effective at the earliest opportunity to prevent confusion and avoid incorrect applications of the state's ethics laws. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Cross References. Code of ethics, public procurements, §19-11-701 et seq.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 849, §§ 3, 4; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-1630, 12-1631.

Subchapter 3

— Code of Ethics

21-8-301. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Constitutional office” means the offices of Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Auditor of State, Treasurer of State, Secretary of State, Commissioner of State Lands, the Attorney General, the General Assembly, Justice of the Supreme Court, Judge of the Court of Appeals, circuit judge, and district judge;

“Governmental body” means an office, department, commission, council, board, committee, legislative body, agency, or other establishment of the executive, judicial, or legislative branch of the state, municipality, county, school district, improvement district, or any political district or subdivision thereof;

“Public appointee” means an individual who is appointed to a governmental body.

“Public appointee” does not include an individual appointed to an elective office;

“Public employee” means an individual who is employed by a governmental body or who is appointed to serve a governmental body.

“Public employee” does not include a public official or a public appointee;

“Public official” means a person holding an elective office of any governmental body, whether elected or appointed to the office.

“Public official” includes without limitation:

A person holding an elective office of any governmental body, whether elected or appointed to the office, during the time period between the date he or she is elected or appointed and the date he or she takes office; and

A member of a school district board of directors;

“Public servant” means a:

Public appointee;

Public employee; or

Public official; and

“Public trust crime” means a crime prohibited under Arkansas Constitution, Article 5, § 9.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment deleted former (1) and (2) and the subdivision (3) designation, and made related changes.

The 2011 amendment deleted “‘state employee’ means all employees of the State of Arkansas employed on a full-time or part-time basis” from the end of the introductory language; and added (1) through (5).

The 2017 amendment redesignated former (4)(B) as the introductory language of (4)(B) and (4)(B)(i); added “without limitation” in the introductory language of (4)(B); and added (4)(B)(ii).

The 2019 amendment added the definitions for “Constitutional office” and “Public trust crime”.

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Survey of Legislation, 2005 Arkansas General Assembly, Election Law, 28 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 351.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 570, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3001; Acts 2005, No. 1284, § 12; 2011, No. 721, § 14; 2017, No. 449, § 1; 2019, No. 894, § 1.

21-8-302. Penalties.

Any person who knowingly or willfully violates any provision of this subchapter shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 570, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3007; Acts 2005, No. 1284, § 13.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment deleted former (b) and the subsection (a) designation; and deleted “fails to file any report pursuant to this subchapter or files an incomplete or inaccurate report or otherwise” following “willfully.”

Cross References. Fines, §5-4-201.

Imprisonment, §5-4-401.

21-8-303. Enforcement.

It shall be the duties and responsibilities of the prosecuting attorneys of this state to supervise compliance with this subchapter and to prosecute persons who violate the provisions of this subchapter.

However, the Arkansas Ethics Commission shall also have authority to investigate and address alleged violations of this subchapter.

In the event the prosecuting attorney shall fail or refuse to enforce the provisions of this subchapter when the facts are known by him or her, or called to his or her attention, any citizen of this state may bring action in circuit court to force compliance with this subchapter.

The citizen shall be entitled to receive reimbursements for expenses and reasonable attorney's fees upon the successful outcome of such litigation.

Amendments. The 1999 amendment added the proviso in (a).

Where a registered voter met his burden of proving that a candidate was ineligible to run for the office of circuit court judge, the circuit court did not err in deciding not to award fees under subsection (b) of this section as there was no evidence that the prosecuting attorney's office first failed or refused to act.Wyatt v. Carr, 2020 Ark. 21, 592 S.W.3d 656 (2020).

No public servant shall disclose any such information gained by reason of his or her position, nor shall he or she otherwise use such information for his or her personal gain or benefit.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Subchapter 10 of this chapter supplements this section.

Amendments. The 2001 amendment, in (a), substituted “use or attempt to use his or her official” for “use his” and inserted “or herself”; and made minor punctuation and gender neutral changes.

The 2011 amendment substituted “servant” for “official or state employee” in (a) through (c).

The 2019 amendment substituted “rule” for “regulation” in (b).

Cross References. State boards and commissions, §21-8-1001 et seq.

Applicability of this section, §6-43-114.

Ark. L. Notes.

Leflar, The Reform of Ethics Rules In Arkansas Government, 2000 Ark. L. Notes 65.

Ark. L. Rev.

Recent Development: Public Officials, 58 Ark. L. Rev. 471.

Cited: Biedenharn v. Thicksten, 361 Ark. 438, 206 S.W.3d 837 (2005).

File as a candidate for a constitutional office;

Run as a candidate for a constitutional office; or

Hold a constitutional office.

Upon inquiry, shall disclose the fact and nature of the crime which the person pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to or was found guilty of; and

Shall not publicly state or affirm under oath that the:

Conduct underlying the plea or finding did not occur;

Record of the underlying plea or finding does not exist; or

Person has not been convicted of a criminal offense.

Publisher's Notes. Former §21-8-305, concerning filing requirements for financial disclosure statements, was repealed by Acts 1999, No. 553, § 31. The former section was derived from Acts 1979, No. 570, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3002; Acts 1989, No. 719, § 5; 1991, No. 326, § 2.

Circuit court did not clearly err in determining that a registered voter had established by a preponderance of the evidence that a circuit court judge candidate had pleaded guilty to and been convicted of violations of the Arkansas Hot Check Law, §5-37-301 et seq., where it required the voter to demonstrate that he had a clear and certain right to the disqualification of the candidate, thereby correctly applying the burden of proof. The candidate also failed to present documentary evidence to contradict the certified court records and admitted that he was 25 years old at the time, which was consistent with the certified court record.Wyatt v. Carr, 2020 Ark. 21, 592 S.W.3d 656 (2020).

Publisher's Notes. Former §§21-8-305 —21-8-309, concerning filing required and exceptions, time and place of filing, public records, contents, and notification of failure to file of financial disclosure statements, were repealed by Acts 1999, No. 553, §§ 31-35. The sections were derived from the following sources:

21-8-305. Acts 1979, No. 570, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3002; Acts 1989, No. 719, § 5; 1991, No. 326, § 2.

21-8-306. Acts 1991, No. 326, § 2.

21-8-307. Acts 1991, No. 326, § 2.

21-8-308. Acts 1991, No. 326, § 2.

21-8-309. Acts 1991, No. 326, § 2.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 570, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3007; Acts 1999, No. 553, § 30.

21-8-304. Prohibited activities.

No public servant shall use or attempt to use his or her official position to secure special privileges or exemptions for himself or herself or his or her spouse, child, parents, or other persons standing in the first degree of relationship, or for those with whom he or she has a substantial financial relationship that are not available to others except as may be otherwise provided by law.

No public servant shall accept employment or engage in any public or professional activity while serving as a public official which he or she might reasonably expect would require or induce him or her to disclose any information acquired by him or her by reason of his or her official position that is declared by law or rule to be confidential.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 570, §§ 3, 4; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-3003, 12-3004; Acts 2001, No. 1839, § 22; 2007, No. 221, § 16; 2011, No. 721, § 15; 2019, No. 315, § 2329.

21-8-305. Person convicted of public trust crime ineligible as candidate for constitutional office or to hold constitutional office.

If a person has pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to or has been found guilty of a public trust crime, he or she shall not:

(1)The sealing of any public trust crime or any similar offense under the Comprehensive Criminal Record Sealing Act of 2013, §16-90-1401 et seq., or any sealing or expungement act in any jurisdiction shall not restore a privilege, eligibility, or qualification to file as a candidate for, run as a candidate for, or hold a constitutional office under this section.

A person who has pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to or has been found guilty of a public trust crime that was sealed or expunged as described in subdivision (b)(1) of this section:

If a person has pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to or has been found guilty of a public trust crime or similar offense that was sealed under the Comprehensive Criminal Record Sealing Act of 2013, §16-90-1401 et seq., or any sealing or expungement act in any jurisdiction, evidence of the plea, finding, and conduct underlying the plea or finding shall be admissible in a court of competent jurisdiction for an action concerning the person's filing for, candidacy for, or holding of a constitutional office.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 894, § 2.

21-8-306 — 21-8-309. [Repealed.]

Persons elected or appointed to the following offices shall not knowingly or willfully solicit or accept a gift in violation of Arkansas Constitution, Article 19, § 30, from a lobbyist, a person acting on behalf of a lobbyist, or a person employing or contracting with a lobbyist:

Governor;

Lieutenant Governor;

Secretary of State;

Treasurer of State;

Auditor of State;

Attorney General;

Commissioner of State Lands;

Member of the General Assembly;

Chief Justice of the Supreme Court;

Justice of the Supreme Court;

Chief Judge of the Court of Appeals;

Judge of the Court of Appeals;

Circuit court judge;

District court judge;

Prosecuting attorney; and

Member of the independent citizens commission for the purpose of setting salaries of elected constitutional officers of the executive department, members of the General Assembly, justices, and judges under Arkansas Constitution, Article 19, § 31.

Effective Dates. Init. Meas. 1988, No. 1, § 1: Jan. 1, 1989.

Acts 2001, No. 1839, § 35: became law without governor's signature. Approved Apr. 20, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that various provisions of the Arkansas Code relating to campaign financing and ethics are vague or otherwise in need of modification; that this act accomplishes those purposes; and that this act should go into effect as soon as possible so that those persons who are subject to the provisions of the various ethics and campaign finance statutes receive the benefit of the clarifications as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2017, No. 312, § 3: Mar. 1, 2017. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the provisions of this act impact the behavior and conduct of public servants in this state by amending certain ethics laws; that the state's ethics laws ensure consistent and appropriate behavior by public office holders and other public servants; and that the provisions of this act should be implemented at the earliest opportunity to ensure that the conduct of public servants is consistent with the ethics laws of this state and the provisions of this act. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Am. Jur. 51 Am. Jur. 2d, Lobby, § 1 et seq.

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Survey, Miscellaneous, 12 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 653.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 1280, § 12.

Subchapter 4

— Disclosure by Lobbyists and State and Local Officials — General Provisions

21-8-401. Title.

This subchapter, §21-8-601 et seq., §21-8-701 et seq., and §21-8-801 et seq. may be referred to and cited as the “Disclosure Act for Lobbyists and State and Local Officials”.

History.

Init. Meas. 1988, No. 1, § 1; Acts 1989, No. 719, § 1; Acts 2007, No. 827, § 175.

21-8-402. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter and §21-8-601 et seq., §21-8-701 et seq., and §21-8-801 et seq., unless the context otherwise requires:

“Administrative action” means any decision on, or proposal, consideration, or making of any rule, ratemaking proceeding, or policy action by a governmental body.

“Administrative action” does not include ministerial action;

“Business” means any corporation, partnership, sole proprietorship, firm, enterprise, franchise, association, organization, self-employed individual, receivership, trust, or any legal entity through which business is conducted;

“County government” means any office, department, commission, council, board, bureau, committee, legislative body, agency, or other establishment of a county;

“Family” means an individual's spouse, children of that individual or his or her spouse, or brothers, sisters, or parents of the individual or his or her spouse;

“Gift” means any payment, entertainment, advance, services, or anything of value, unless consideration of equal or greater value has been given therefor.

The term “gift” does not include:

(a)Informational material such as books, reports, pamphlets, calendars, or periodicals informing a public servant regarding his or her official duties.

Payments for travel or reimbursement for any expenses are not informational material;

The giving or receiving of food, lodging, or travel which bears a relationship to the public servant's office and when appearing in an official capacity;

Gifts which are not used and which, within thirty (30) days after receipt, are returned to the donor;

Gifts from an individual's spouse, child, parent, grandparent, grandchild, brother, sister, parent-in-law, brother-in-law, sister-in-law, nephew, niece, aunt, uncle, or first cousin, or the spouse of any of these persons, unless the person is acting as an agent or intermediary for any person not covered by this subdivision (5)(B)(iv);

Campaign contributions;

Any devise or inheritance;

(a)Anything with a value of one hundred dollars ($100) or less.

The value of an item shall be considered to be less than one hundred dollars ($100) if the public servant reimburses the person from whom the item was received any amount over one hundred dollars ($100) and the reimbursement occurs within ten (10) days from the date the item was received;

Wedding presents and engagement gifts;

A monetary or other award presented to an employee of a public school district, the Arkansas School for the Blind, the Arkansas School for the Deaf, the Arkansas School for Mathematics, Sciences, and the Arts, a university, a college, a technical college, a technical institute, a comprehensive life-long learning center, or a community college in recognition of the employee's contribution to education;

Tickets to charitable fund-raising events held within this state by a nonprofit organization which is exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code;

A personalized award, plaque, or trophy with a value of one hundred and fifty dollars ($150) or less;

An item which appointed or elected members of a specific governmental body purchase with their own personal funds and present to a fellow member of that governmental body in recognition of public service;

Food or beverages provided at a conference-scheduled event that is part of the program of the conference;

Food or beverages provided in return for participation in a bona fide panel, seminar, or speaking engagement at which the audience is a civic, social, or cultural organization or group;

(a)A monetary or other award publicly presented to an employee of state government in recognition of his or her contributions to the community and State of Arkansas when the presentation is made by the employee's supervisors or peers, individually or through a nonprofit organization which is exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, and the employee's receipt of the award would not result in or create the appearance of the employee using his or her position for private gain, giving preferential treatment to any person, or losing independence or impartiality.

The exception in subdivision (5)(B)(xv)(a) of this section shall not apply to an award presented to an employee of state government by a person having economic interests which may be affected by the performance or nonperformance of the employee's duties or responsibilities; and

Anything of value provided by a political party under § 7-1-101 or § 7-7-205 when serving as the host of the following events to all attendees as part of attendance at the event:

The official swearing-in, inaugural, and recognition events of constitutional officers and members of the General Assembly; and

An official event of a recognized political party so long as all members of either house of the General Assembly affiliated with the recognized political party are invited to the official event;

Amendments. The 1999 amendment rewrote (5)(B)(vii); added (5)(B)(viii); and added the language beginning with “and shall include such persons” in (16).

The 2001 amendment by No. 239 inserted present (13) and renumbered the remaining subdivisions accordingly.

The 2001 amendment by Nos. 1192 and 1839 rewrote (7).

The 2001 amendment by No. 1839 rewrote (5)(B); in (11)(A)-(C), substituted “four hundred dollars ($400)” for “two hundred fifty dollars ($250)”; added present (20); and made stylistic changes.

The 2017 amendment by No. 312 added (5)(B)(xvi).

The 2017 amendment by No. 449 redesignated former (9) as the introductory language of (9) and (9)(A) through (9)(C); added (9)(D); redesignated former (17) as (17)(A); and added (17)(B).

The 2019 amendment deleted “regulation” following “rule” in (1)(A).

U.S. Code. Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, referred to in this section, is codified as 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3).

“Governmental body” means any office, department, commission, council, board, committee, legislative body, agency, or other establishment of the executive, judicial, or legislative branch of the state, municipality, county, school district, improvement district, or any political district or subdivision thereof;

(A)“Income” or “compensation” means any money or anything of value received or to be received as a claim for future services, whether in the form of a retainer, fee, salary, expense, allowance, forbearance, forgiveness, interest, dividend, royalty, rent, or any other form of recompense or any combination thereof. It includes a payment made under obligation for services or other value received.

The term “compensation” does not include anything of value presented to an employee of a public school district, the Arkansas School for the Blind, the Arkansas School for the Deaf, the Arkansas School for Mathematics, Sciences, and the Arts, a university, a college, a technical college, a technical institute, a comprehensive life-long learning center, or a community college in recognition of the employee's contribution to education;

“Legislative action” means introduction, sponsorship, consideration, debate, amendment, passage, defeat, approval, veto, or any other official action or nonaction on any bill, ordinance, law, resolution, amendment, nomination, appointment, report, or other matter pending or proposed before a committee or house of the General Assembly, a quorum court, or a city council or board of directors of a municipality;

“Legislator” means any person who is a member of:

The General Assembly;

A quorum court of any county;

The city council or board of directors of any municipality; or

A member of a school district board of directors;

“Lobbying” means communicating directly or soliciting others to communicate with any public servant with the purpose of influencing legislative action or administrative action;

“Lobbyist” means a person who:

Receives income or reimbursement in a combined amount of four hundred dollars ($400) or more in a calendar quarter for lobbying one (1) or more governmental bodies;

Expends four hundred dollars ($400) or more in a calendar quarter for lobbying one (1) or more governmental bodies, excluding the cost of personal travel, lodging, meals, or dues; or

Expends four hundred dollars ($400) or more in a calendar quarter, including postage, for the express purpose of soliciting others to communicate with any public servant to influence any legislative action or administrative action of one (1) or more governmental bodies unless the communication has been filed with the Secretary of State or the communication has been published in the news media. If the communication is filed with the Secretary of State, the filing shall include the approximate number of recipients;

“Municipal government” means any office, department, commission, council, board, bureau, committee, legislative body, agency, or other establishment of a municipality;

“Official capacity” means activities which:

Arise solely because of the position held by the public servant;

Would be subject to expense reimbursement by the agency with which the public servant is associated; and

Involve matters which fall within the official responsibility of the public servant;

“Person” means a business, individual, corporation, union, association, firm, partnership, committee, club, or other organization or group of persons;

(A)“Public appointee” means an individual who is appointed to a governmental body.

“Public appointee” shall not include an individual appointed to an elective office;

(A)“Public employee” means an individual who is employed by a governmental body or who is appointed to serve a governmental body.

“Public employee” shall not include public officials or public appointees;

(A)“Public official” means a legislator or any other person holding an elective office of any governmental body, whether elected or appointed to the office, and shall include such persons during the time period between the date they were elected and the date they took office.

“Public official” includes without limitation a member of a school district board of directors;

“Public servant” means all public officials, public employees, and public appointees;

“Registered lobbyist” means a lobbyist registered pursuant to the provisions of this subchapter and §21-8-601 et seq., §21-8-701 et seq., and §21-8-801 et seq.;

“Special event” means a planned activity to which a specific governmental body or identifiable group of public servants is invited; and

“State government” means any office, department, commission, council, board, bureau, committee, legislative body, agency, or other establishment of the State of Arkansas.

History.

Init. Meas. 1988, No. 1, § 1; Acts 1989, No. 719, § 1; 1999, No. 553, §§ 36, 37; 2001, No. 239, § 1; 2001, No. 1192, §§ 1, 2; 2001, No. 1839, §§ 23-26; 2007, No. 827, §§ 176, 177; 2017, No. 312, §
2; 2017, No. 449, §§ 2, 3; 2019, No. 315, § 2330.

21-8-403. Penalty.

Upon conviction, any person who violates any provision of this subchapter, §21-8-601 et seq., §21-8-701 et seq., or §21-8-801 et seq. is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

The culpable mental state required shall be a purposeful violation.

History.

Init. Meas. 1988, No. 1, § 1; Acts 1989, No. 719, § 1; 2007, No. 827, § 178.

21-8-404. Investigation generally.

The prosecuting attorney of the district where an alleged violation occurred shall have the authority to investigate the alleged violations of this chapter.

History.

Init. Meas. 1988, No. 1, § 1; Acts 1989, No. 719, § 1.

Cross References. Arkansas Ethics Commission, §7-6-217.

21-8-405. Provisions supplemental.

This subchapter, §21-8-601 et seq., §21-8-701 et seq., and §21-8-801 et seq. are supplemental to any other law pertaining to ethics or conflicts of interest and do not repeal any other law except for a law specifically repealed by this subchapter, §21-8-601 et seq., §21-8-701 et seq., or §21-8-801 et seq.

History.

Init. Meas. 1988, No. 1, § 1; Acts 1989, No. 719, § 1; 2007, No. 827, § 179.

21-8-406. Tickets to charitable events.

For the purposes of this subchapter, §21-8-601 et seq., §21-8-701 et seq., and §21-8-801 et seq., the value of a ticket to a charitable event shall not include the tax deductible portion of the ticket.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 117, § 1.

21-8-407. Gifts of art.

Any work of art contracted for prior to January 1, 1998, for public service recognition for members of the General Assembly shall not be a gift under §21-8-402 nor shall it be deemed an unlawful gift under any other statute or rule.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1839, § 33; 2019, No. 315, § 2331.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “rule” for “regulation”.

Subchapter 5

— Disclosure by Lobbyists and State and Local Officials — Investigation by Attorney General

21-8-501 — 21-8-503. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes. This subchapter, concerning disclosure by lobbyists and state and local officials and investigation by the attorney general, was repealed by Initiated Measure 1990, No. 1, § 7. The subchapter was derived from:

21-8-501. Init. Meas. 1988, No. 1, § 1.

21-8-503. Init. Meas. 1988, No. 1, § 1.

For present law, see §§7-6-217 and7-6-218.

Subchapter 6

— Disclosure by Lobbyists

Effective Dates. Init. Meas. 1988, No. 1, § 1: Jan. 1, 1989.

Init. Meas. 1990, No. 1, §§ 7, 9: July 1, 1991.

Acts 2001, No. 1839, § 35: became law without governor's signature. Approved Apr. 20, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that various provisions of the Arkansas Code relating to campaign financing and ethics are vague or otherwise in need of modification; that this act accomplishes those purposes; and that this act should go into effect as soon as possible so that those persons who are subject to the provisions of the various ethics and campaign finance statutes receive the benefit of the clarifications as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”